Oklahoma, session 2026, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 106.4, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 100, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 106.4), is amended to read as follows:


Section 106.4. A. 1. The court reporter shall make a full


reporting by means of stenographic hand, steno-mask or machine


notes, or a combination thereof, of all proceedings, including the


statements of counsel and the court and the evidence, in trials and


other judicial proceedings to which the court reporter is assigned


by the appointing judge unless excused by the judge who is trying


the case with the consent of the parties to the action. Nothing


herein contained in this section shall be construed to authorize the


certification of persons as certified shorthand reporters who rely

Req. No. 1550 Page 1


exclusively upon the steno-mask for reporting judicial proceedings,


except as provided by law. A refusal of the court to permit or to


require any statement to be taken down by the court reporter or


transcribed after being taken down, upon the same being shown by


affidavit or other direct and competent evidence, to the Supreme


Court, or other appellate court, shall constitute a denial of due


process of law. The court reporter may use an electronic instrument


as a supplementary device.


2. In any trial, hearing or proceedings, if no court reporter


is available to the assigned judge:


a. the judge before whom the matter is being heard may


order the proceedings electronically recorded and a


trial or proceedings may proceed without the necessity


of a court reporter being present. Provided that if


an official transcript is ordered then it shall be


prepared by the official court reporter, or


b. with approval of the judge, the parties may stipulate


to the use of a freelance reporter and share the cost.


If ordered, the transcript shall be prepared by the


approved reporter and shall be considered the official


transcript for all purposes.


B. Upon request of either party in a civil or criminal case,


the reporter shall transcribe the proceedings in a trial or other


judicial proceeding, or so much thereof as may be requested by the

Req. No. 1550 Page 2


party, certify to the correctness of the transcript, and deliver the


same in accordance with the rules of the Supreme Court. The fee for


A certified copy of an original transcript shall be set by the


Supreme Court. Two copies of the original transcript shall be


furnished by the court to all parties without additional charge.


Each page shall be at least twenty-five lines to the page and typed


no fewer than nine characters to the typed inch. Each page shall be


no more than double spaced and the margin on the left side of the


page shall be no more than one and one-half (1 1/2) inches and the


margin on the right side of the page shall be no more than one-half


(1/2) inch from the edge of the paper. The format for all


transcripts shall be prescribed by the Supreme Court. The court


reporter fees for making the transcript shall be paid in the first


instance by the party requesting the transcript and shall be taxed


as costs in the suit.


When the judge on his or her own motion orders a transcript of


the reporter’s notes, the judge may direct the payment of charges


and the taxation of the charges as costs in such manner as the court


deems appropriate. In a criminal action, if the defendant shall


present to the judge an affidavit that the defendant intends in good


faith to take an appeal in the case and that a transcript of the


reporter’s notes is necessary to enable the defendant to prosecute


the appeal, and that he or she has not the means to pay for the


transcript, the court, upon finding that there is reasonable basis

Req. No. 1550 Page 3


for the averment, shall order the transcript made at the expense of


the district court fund. The format preparation, delivery and


filing of transcripts to be used in civil and criminal appeals may


be regulated by the Supreme Court.


C. The court reporter shall file his or her records of the


evidence and the proceedings taken in any case with the clerk of the


court in which the case was tried.


D. To the extent that it does not substantially interfere with


the court reporter’s other official duties, the judge by whom a


reporter is employed or to whom he or she is assigned may assign a


reporter to secretarial or clerical duties arising out of official


court operations.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1550 TEK 12/30/2024 5:02:22 PM



















Req. No. 1550 Page 4